Florida, session 2026, SB1004.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 49 50 Section 1.âSubsection (7) of section 828.12, Florida 51 Statutes, is amended, and subsection (8) is added to that 52 section, to read: 53 828.12âCruelty to animals.â 54 (7)âBy Beginning January 1, 2027 2026, the Department of 55 Law Enforcement shall post on its website, in a searchable 56 format prescribed by the department, the names and any aliases, 57 the date of birth, the race, the counties of conviction, the 58 charges, the case numbers, the dispositions, the description of 59 any identifying marks and tattoos, and a photograph taken at the 60 time of booking related to the animal cruelty offense of each 61 individual those individuals who has have been convicted of, or 62 who has have entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to, 63 regardless of adjudication, a violation of this section. 64 (8)âEach clerk of court and county detention facility must 65 provide the Department of Law Enforcement with the information, 66 data, and images required in subsection (7). 67 Section 2.âSubsections (5) through (8), (10), (12), (13), 68 and (17) of section 828.29, Florida Statutes, are amended, and 69 subsections (18) and (19) are added to that section, to read: 70 828.29âDogs and cats transported or offered for sale; 71 health requirements; consumer guarantee; disclosures.â 72 (5)âIf, within 30 14 days after following the sale by a pet 73 dealer of an animal subject to this section, a licensed 74 veterinarian of the consumerâs choosing certifies that, at the 75 time of the sale, the animal was unfit for purchase due to 76 illness or disease, the presence of symptoms of a contagious or 77 infectious disease, or the presence of internal or external 78 parasites, excluding fleas and ticks; or if, within 1 year after 79 following the sale of an animal subject to this section, a 80 licensed veterinarian of the consumerâs choosing certifies such 81 animal to be unfit for purchase due to a congenital or 82 hereditary disorder which adversely affects the health of the 83 animal; or if, within 1 year after following the sale of an 84 animal subject to this section, the breed, sex, or health of 85 such animal is found to have been misrepresented to the 86 consumer, the pet dealer shall afford the consumer the right to 87 choose one of the following options: 88 (a)âThe right to return the animal and receive a refund of 89 the purchase price, including any interest accrued and the sales 90 tax or fees paid or due from the purchaser, and reimbursement 91 for reasonable veterinary costs directly related to the 92 veterinarianâs examination and certification that the animal dog 93 or cat is unfit for purchase pursuant to this section or and 94 directly related to necessary emergency services and treatment 95 undertaken to relieve the suffering of such animal. If the 96 consumer financed the animal pursuant to a financing agreement 97 with the pet dealer, the pet dealer must ensure that the 98 financing agreement is terminated without penalty to the 99 consumer; 100 (b)âThe right to return the animal and receive an exchange 101 animal dog or cat of the consumerâs choice of equivalent value, 102 and reimbursement for reasonable veterinary costs directly 103 related to the veterinarianâs examination and certification that 104 the animal dog or cat is unfit for purchase pursuant to this 105 section or and directly related to necessary emergency services 106 and treatment undertaken to relieve the suffering of such 107 animal; or 108 (c)âThe right to retain the animal and receive 109 reimbursement for reasonable veterinary costs for necessary 110 services and treatment related to the attempt to cure or curing 111 of the animal, or necessary emergency services or treatment 112 undertaken to relieve the suffering of such animal received 113 within 1 year after purchase dog or cat. 114 115 Reimbursement for veterinary costs may not exceed the purchase 116 price of the animal. The cost of veterinary services is 117 reasonable if comparable to the cost of similar services 118 rendered by other licensed veterinarians in proximity to the 119 treating veterinarian and the services rendered are appropriate 120 for the certification by the veterinarian. 121 (6)âAll financing terms must be disclosed by the pet dealer 122 to the consumer before the sale of the animal A consumer may 123 sign a waiver relinquishing his or her right to return the dog 124 or cat for congenital or hereditary disorders. In the case of 125 such waiver, the consumer has 48 normal business hours, 126 excluding weekends and holidays, in which to have the animal 127 examined by a licensed veterinarian of the consumerâs choosing. 128 If the veterinarian certifies that, at the time of sale, the dog 129 or cat was unfit for purchase due to a congenital or hereditary 130 disorder, the pet dealer must afford the consumer the right to 131 choose one of the following options: 132 (a)âThe right to return the animal and receive a refund of 133 the purchase price, including sales tax, but excluding the 134 veterinary costs related to the certification that the dog or 135 cat is unfit; or 136 (b)âThe right to return the animal and receive an exchange 137 dog or cat of the consumerâs choice of equivalent value, but not 138 a refund of the veterinary costs related to the certification 139 that the dog or cat is unfit. 140 (7)âBefore the sale of an animal, a pet dealer must provide 141 to the consumer copies of records of all medical examinations or 142 tests that were conducted on the animal or any medication given 143 before the purchase of the animal. A pet dealer may specifically 144 state at the time of sale, in writing to the consumer, the 145 presence of specific congenital or hereditary disorders, in 146 which case the consumer has no right to any refund or exchange 147 for those identified disorders, if such consumer signs a 148 notification that indicates that the animal has been examined by 149 a veterinarian who determined that the animal has the identified 150 congenital or hereditary disorder. 151 (8)âThe refund or exchange required by subsection (5) must 152 or subsection (6) shall be made by the pet dealer not later than 153 10 business days after following receipt of a signed veterinary 154 certification as required in subsection (5) or subsection (6). 155 The consumer must notify the pet dealer within 7 2 business days 156 after receipt of the veterinarianâs determination that the 157 animal is unfit. The written certification of unfitness must be 158 presented to the pet dealer not later than 3 business days 159 following receipt thereof by the consumer. 160 (10)âIf a pet dealer wishes to contest a demand for 161 veterinary expenses, refund, or exchange made by a consumer 162 under this section, the dealer may require the consumer to 163 produce the animal for examination by a licensed veterinarian 164 designated by the dealer. Upon such examination, if the consumer 165 and the dealer are unable to reach an agreement that constitutes 166 one of the options set forth in subsection (5) or subsection (6) 167 within 10 business days after following receipt of the animal 168 for such examination, the consumer may initiate an action in a 169 court of competent jurisdiction, or the county court small 170 claims court division, in the county where the animal owner 171 resides, to recover or obtain reimbursement of veterinary 172 expenses and a, refund, or exchange, as set forth in subsection 173 (5), and may collect punitive damages in an amount not less than 174 $2,500 at the discretion of the court. 175 (12)âEvery pet dealer who sells an animal to a consumer 176 must provide the consumer at the time of sale with a printed, 177 written notice in 14-point boldface type to be signed by the 178 consumer, printed or typed, which is separate from the contract 179 and reads as follows: 180 181 RIGHT TO CANCEL 182 Florida consumers have certain rights under section 183 828.29, Florida Statutes. You have the right to: 1) 184 return the animal; 2) exchange the animal; and 3) 185 receive reimbursement for certain veterinary expenses 186 under certain circumstances. Please have your new pet 187 seen by a veterinarian immediately. A copy of this law 188 is attached to this notice. 189 190 It is the consumerâs right, pursuant to section 191 828.29, Florida Statutes, to receive a certificate of 192 veterinary inspection with each animal dog or cat 193 purchased from a pet dealer. Such certificate shall 194 list all vaccines and deworming medications 195 administered to the animal and list any medical 196 diagnosis and treatments and shall state that the 197 animal has been examined by a Florida-licensed 198 veterinarian who certifies that, to the best of the 199 veterinarianâs knowledge, the animal was found to have 200 been healthy at the time of the veterinary 201 examination. In the event that the consumer purchases 202 the animal and finds it to have been unfit for 203 purchase as provided in section 828.29(5), Florida 204 Statutes, the consumer must notify the pet dealer 205 within 7 2 business days after of the veterinarianâs 206 determination that the animal was unfit. The consumer 207 has the right to retain, return, or exchange the 208 animal and receive reimbursement for certain related 209 veterinary services rendered to the animal, subject to 210 the right of the dealer to have the animal examined by 211 another veterinarian. 212 213 ...(Signature of Animal owner or Lessee, or Ownerâs or 214 Lesseeâs Authorized Person)... 215 216 (13)âFor the purposes of this section subsections (5)-(12) 217 and (16), the term âpet dealerâ means any person, firm, 218 partnership, corporation, or other association which, in the 219 ordinary course of business, engages in the sale of more than 220 three two litters, or 30 20 dogs or cats, per year, whichever is 221 greater, to the public. This definition includes breeders of 222 animals who sell such animals directly to a consumer. This 223 definition does not include not-for-profit entities that do not 224 purchase dogs or cats from a breeder or broker. 225 (17)âExcept as otherwise provided in this chapter, a person 226 who violates any provision of this section commits a misdemeanor 227 of the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 228 775.083. 229 (18)âAny record provided to a consumer pursuant to the sale 230 of an animal under this section must be maintained by the pet 231 dealer for a period of at least 7 years after the sale. 232 (19)âA pet dealer who violates this section commits an 233 unfair method of competition or an unfair or deceptive act or 234 practice in violation of part II of chapter 501 and is subject 235 to the penalties and remedies provided for such violations. 236 Section 3.âSection 828.291, Florida Statutes, is created to 237 read: 238 828.291âBest management practices for dog breeding.â 239 (1)âThe purpose of this section is to allow voluntary 240 participation in best management practices relating to minimum 241 standards of care, facility operations, and breeding practices 242 for individuals or entities engaged in the breeding of dogs in 243 order to protect animal welfare, promote responsible breeding, 244 and ensure the health and safety of animals and consumers. 245 (2)âThis section may not be construed to prohibit a local 246 jurisdiction from implementing requirements for individuals or 247 entities engaged in the breeding of dogs. 248 (3)âThe Department of Business and Professional Regulation 249 shall develop a list of best management practices that 250 individuals or entities engaged in the breeding of dogs may 251 voluntarily adopt and implement. Such best management practices 252 must include minimum standards of care, facility operations, and 253 breeding practices for individuals or entities engaged in the 254 breeding of dogs, including, but not limited to, standards 255 relating to all of the following: 256 (a)âBreeding. 257 (b)âFeeding. 258 (c)âHousing. 259 (d)âHealth. 260 (e)âEnrichment. 261 (f)âSelling and transferring, in accordance with s. 828.29. 262 (g)âRecordkeeping, in accordance with s. 828.29. 263 (4)âThe Department of Business and Professional Regulation 264 shall post on its website guidance for the public about how to 265 identify the breeders that are following best management 266 practices and provide a checklist to use when purchasing an 267 animal. 268 (5)âThe Department of Business and Professional Regulation 269 shall post on its website information regarding animal cruelty, 270 including a description of conduct constituting animal cruelty 271 under ss. 828.12 and 828.13, the penalties for such conduct, and 272 instructions for reporting suspected animal cruelty or abuse to 273 the appropriate local authorities, including the contact 274 information for at least one appropriate authority for each 275 county in the state. 276 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.